test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UHL_STEM_1.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_UHL_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_UHL_STEM_1

     ñáaguhl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñáaguhl
     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl
     ñáaguhl+V+RELATIVE: ñáaguhls
     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñáaguhläsaa
     ñáaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñáaguhläs
     ñáaguhl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñáaguhläsaang
     ñáaguhl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñáaguhläsga
     ñáaguhl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhläsaas
     ñáaguhl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhläsaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'uuj
     ñáaguhl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñáaguhläsaa'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'us
     ñáaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'ujaa
     ñáaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'uujaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhläsaa'us
     ñáaguhl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñáaguhläsaa'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñáaguhläseehl
     ñáaguhl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñáaguhl'uu
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'waa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'waa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'waang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñáaguhl'wägan
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'aawaa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñáaguhl'aawaan
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñáaguhl'waas
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñáaguhl'aawaas
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'aawaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'wägiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'wägaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'wägaangaan
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñáaguhl'waaäsaa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñáaguhl'waaäs
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waaäsaang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waaäsga
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waaäsaas
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'waaäsaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'waa'uuj
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'waa'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñáaguhl'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'waa'us
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'waa'ujaa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'waa'uujaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waaäsaa'us
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'waa'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñáaguhl'waa'ahlanggan
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñáaguhl'waa'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'aawaa'ahlang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñáaguhl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñáaguhl'waa'ahl
     ñáaguhl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñáaguhl'waaäseehl
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: ñáaguhl'ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'angga
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'anggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: ñáaguhl'anggan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'aangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: ñáaguhl'aangaan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: ñáaguhl'ans
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñáaguhl'aangaas
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'angang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'aangaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'anggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'anggiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'anggaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'anggaangaan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñáaguhl'angäsaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñáaguhl'angäs
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'angäsaang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'angäsga
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'angäsaas
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'angäsaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'uuj
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñáaguhl'angäsaa'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'us
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'ang'ujaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'ang'uujaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'angäsaa'us
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'aang'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: ñáaguhl'aang'ahlanggan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'angäsaa'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñáaguhl'aang'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'aangaa'ahlang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñáaguhl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: ñáaguhl'aang'ahl
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñáaguhl'angäseehl
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'uu
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'waa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'waa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'waang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: ñáaguhl'ang'wägan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'ang'aawaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: ñáaguhl'ang'aawaan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'waas
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñáaguhl'ang'aawaas
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'waa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'aawaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'ang'wägiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'ang'wägaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'ang'wägaangaan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäs
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsaang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsga
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsaas
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'uuj
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'us
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'ujaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'ahlans
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñáaguhl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñáaguhl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñáaguhl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'waa'ahl
     ñáaguhl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñáaguhl'ang'waaäseehl
